Tennessee, session 114, HB1507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee School Safety Act
of 2026."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3401(g), is amended by
designating subdivision (6) as subdivision (7) and adding the following as a new subdivision (6):
(6) Notwithstanding this section or another law to the contrary, if a student has
been expelled on two (2) or more separate occasions for the zero tolerance offense of
threatening mass violence on school property or at a school-related activity, as
described in subdivision (g)(2)(D), then the director of schools or the head of the public
charter school, as applicable, shall require the student to submit to a psychiatric
examination conducted by a medical professional who is trained in performing the
examination to determine if the student is not a threat to the school and can safely return
to school. The director of schools or the head of a public charter school shall not
authorize a student who is required to submit to a psychiatric examination pursuant to
this subdivision (g)(6) to return to school or a school-related activity until the director of
schools or the head of the public charter school receives documentation that the medical
professional finds that the student is no longer a threat to the school and can safely
return to the school.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1507
009731
- 1 -